Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4636
Appeal.

Upon the hearing of the appeal in the district court, judgment shall be pronounced, as in ordinary cases, for the value of the gas system. The city or utility may appeal the judgment to the Supreme Court. All actions and proceedings under the Municipal Natural Gas System Condemnation Act which are heard by the district court or the Supreme Court shall be expedited for hearing and decision by the appropriate court as soon as the issues and parties are properly before such court. Such proceedings and actions shall be preferred over all other civil cases irrespective of their position on the calendar.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 13.